Utah statutes.
58-1-501.   Unlawful and unprofessional conduct.
(1)  "Unlawful conduct" means conduct, by any person, that is defined as
unlawful under this title and includes:
(a)  practicing or engaging in, representing oneself to be practicing or
engaging in, or attempting to practice or engage in any occupation or
profession requiring licensure under this title if the person is:
(i)  not licensed to do so or not exempted from licensure under this title; or
(ii)  restricted from doing so by a suspended, revoked, restricted, temporary,
probationary, or inactive license;
(b)  impersonating another licensee or practicing an occupation or profession
under a false or assumed name, except as permitted by law;
(c)  knowingly employing any other person to practice or engage in or attempt
to practice or engage in any occupation or profession licensed under this
title if the employee is not licensed to do so under this title;
(d)  knowingly permitting the person's authority to practice or engage in any
occupation or profession licensed under this title to be used by another,
except as permitted by law;
(e)  obtaining a passing score on a licensure examination, applying for or
obtaining a license, or otherwise dealing with the division or a licensing
board through the use of fraud, forgery, or intentional deception,
misrepresentation, misstatement, or omission; or
(f) (i) issuing, or aiding and abetting in the issuance of, an order or
prescription for a drug or device to a person located in this state:
(A)  without prescriptive authority conferred by a license issued under this
title, or by an exemption to licensure under this title; or
(B)  with prescriptive authority conferred by an exception issued under this
title or a multistate practice privilege recognized under this title, if the
prescription was issued without first obtaining information, in the usual
course of professional practice, that is sufficient to establish a diagnosis,
to identify underlying conditions, and to identify contraindications to the
proposed treatment; and
(ii)  Subsection (1)(f)(i) does not apply to treatment rendered in an
emergency, on-call or cross coverage situation, provided that the person who
issues the prescription has prescriptive authority conferred by a license
under this title, or is exempt from licensure under this title.
(2)  "Unprofessional conduct" means conduct, by a licensee or applicant, that
is defined as unprofessional conduct under this title or under any rule
adopted under this title and includes:
(a)  violating, or aiding or abetting any other person to violate, any
statute, rule, or order regulating an occupation or profession under this
title;
(b)  violating, or aiding or abetting any other person to violate, any
generally accepted professional or ethical standard applicable to an
occupation or profession regulated under this title;
(c)  engaging in conduct that results in conviction, a plea of nolo
contendere, or a plea of guilty or nolo contendere which is held in abeyance
pending the successful completion of probation with respect to a crime of
moral turpitude or any other crime that, when considered with the functions
and duties of the occupation or profession for which the license was issued or
is to be issued, bears a reasonable relationship to the licensee's or
applicant's ability to safely or competently practice the occupation or
profession;
(d)  engaging in conduct that results in disciplinary action, including
reprimand, censure, diversion, probation, suspension, or revocation, by any
other licensing or regulatory authority having jurisdiction over the licensee
or applicant in the same occupation or profession if the conduct would, in
this state, constitute grounds for denial of licensure or disciplinary
proceedings under Section 58-1-401;
(e)  engaging in conduct, including the use of intoxicants, drugs, narcotics,
or similar chemicals, to the extent that the conduct does, or might reasonably
be considered to, impair the ability of the licensee or applicant to safely
engage in the occupation or profession;
(f)  practicing or attempting to practice an occupation or profession
regulated under this title despite being physically or mentally unfit to do
so;
(g)  practicing or attempting to practice an occupation or profession
regulated under this title through gross incompetence, gross negligence, or a
pattern of incompetency or negligence;
(h)  practicing or attempting to practice an occupation or profession
requiring licensure under this title by any form of action or communication
which is false, misleading, deceptive, or fraudulent;
(i)  practicing or attempting to practice an occupation or profession
regulated under this title beyond the scope of the licensee's competency,
abilities, or education;
(j)  practicing or attempting to practice an occupation or profession
regulated under this title beyond the scope of the licensee's license;
(k)  verbally, physically, mentally, or sexually abusing or exploiting any
person through conduct connected with the licensee's practice under this title
or otherwise facilitated by the licensee's license;
(l)  acting as a supervisor without meeting the qualification requirements for
that position that are defined by statute or rule;
(m) issuing, or aiding and abetting in the issuance of, an order or
prescription for a drug or device:
(i)  without first obtaining information in the usual course of professional
practice, that is sufficient to establish a diagnosis, to identify conditions,
and to identify contraindications to the proposed treatment; or
(ii)  with prescriptive authority conferred by an exception issued under this
title, or a multi-state practice privilege recognized under this title, if the
prescription was issued without first obtaining information, in the usual
course of professional practice, that is sufficient to establish a diagnosis,
to identify underlying conditions, and to identify contraindications to the
proposed treatment; or
(n)  violating a provision of Section 58-1-501.5.
